Utah statutes.
75-2-801.   Disclaimer of property interests -- Time -- Form -- Effect --
Waiver and bar -- Remedy not exclusive -- Application.
(1)  A person, or the representative of a person, to whom an interest in or
with respect to property or an interest therein devolves by whatever means may
disclaim it in whole or in part by delivering or filing a written disclaimer
under this section.  The right to disclaim exists notwithstanding:
(a)  any limitation on the interest of the disclaimant in the nature of a
spendthrift provision or similar restriction; or
(b)  any restriction or limitation on the right to disclaim contained in the
governing instrument.  For purposes of this subsection, the "representative of
a person" includes a personal representative of a decedent, a conservator of a
disabled person, a guardian of a minor or incapacitated person, and an agent
acting on behalf of the person within the authority of a power of attorney.
(2)  The following rules govern the time when a disclaimer shall be filed or
delivered:
(a)  If the property or interest has devolved to the disclaimant under a
testamentary instrument or by the laws of intestacy, the disclaimer shall be
filed, if of a present interest, not later than nine months after the death of
the deceased owner or deceased donee of a power of appointment and, if of a
future interest, not later than nine months after the event determining that
the taker of the property or interest is finally ascertained and his interest
is indefeasibly vested.  The disclaimer shall be filed in the district court
of the county in which proceedings for the administration of the estate of the
deceased owner or deceased donee of the power have been commenced.  A copy of
the disclaimer shall be delivered in person or mailed by registered or
certified mail, return receipt requested, to any personal representative or
other fiduciary of the decedent or donee of the power.
(b)  If a property or interest has devolved to the disclaimant under a
nontestamentary instrument or contract, the disclaimer shall be delivered or
filed, if of a present interest, not later than nine months after the
effective date of the nontestamentary instrument or contract and, if of a
future interest, not later than nine months after the event determining that
the taker of the property or interest is finally ascertained and his interest
is indefeasibly vested.  If the person entitled to disclaim does not know of
the existence of the interest, the disclaimer shall be delivered or filed not
later than nine months after the person learns of the existence of the
interest.  The effective date of a revocable instrument or contract is the
date on which the maker no longer has power to revoke it or to transfer to
himself or another the entire legal and equitable ownership of the interest.
The disclaimer or a copy thereof shall be delivered in person or mailed by
registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person who has
legal title to or possession of the interest disclaimed.
(c)  A surviving joint tenant or tenant by the entireties may disclaim as a
separate interest any property or interest therein devolving to him by right
of survivorship.  A surviving joint tenant or tenant by the entireties may
disclaim the entire interest in any property or interest therein that is the
subject of a joint tenancy or tenancy by the entireties devolving to him, if
the joint tenancy or tenancy by the entireties was created by act of a
deceased joint tenant or tenant by the entireties, the survivor did not join
in creating the joint tenancy or tenancy by the entireties, and has not
accepted a benefit under it.
(d)  If real property or an interest therein is disclaimed, a copy of the
disclaimer may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county
in which the property or interest disclaimed is located.
(3)  The disclaimer shall:
(a)  describe the property or interest disclaimed;
(b)  declare the disclaimer and extent thereof; and
(c)  be signed by the disclaimant.
(4)  The effects of a disclaimer are:
(a)  If property or an interest therein devolves to a disclaimant under a
testamentary instrument, under a power of appointment exercised by a
testamentary instrument, or under the laws of intestacy, and the decedent has
not provided for another disposition of that interest, should it be
disclaimed, or of disclaimed, or failed interests in general, the disclaimed
interest devolves as if the disclaimant had predeceased the decedent, but if
by law or under the testamentary instrument the descendants of the disclaimant
would share in the disclaimed interest per capita at each generation or
otherwise were the disclaimant to predecease the decedent, then the disclaimed
interest passes per capita at each generation, or passes as directed by the
governing instrument, to the descendants of the disclaimant who survive the
decedent.  A future interest that takes effect in possession or enjoyment
after the termination of the estate or interest disclaimed takes effect as if
the disclaimant had predeceased the decedent.  A disclaimer relates back for
all purposes to the date of death of the decedent.
(b)  If property or an interest therein devolves to a disclaimant under a
nontestamentary instrument or contract and the instrument or contract does not
provide for another disposition of that interest, should it be disclaimed, or
of disclaimed or failed interests in general, the disclaimed interest devolves
as if the disclaimant has predeceased the effective date of the instrument or
contract, but if by law or under the nontestamentary instrument or contract
the descendants of the disclaimant would share in the disclaimed interest per
capita at each generation or otherwise were the disclaimant to predecease the
effective date of the instrument, then the disclaimed interest passes per
capita at each generation, or passes as directed by the governing instrument,
to the descendants of the disclaimant who survive the effective date of the
instrument.  A disclaimer relates back for all purposes to that date.  A
future interest that takes effect in possession or enjoyment at or after the
termination of the disclaimed interest takes effect as if the disclaimant had
died before the effective date of the instrument or contract that transferred
the disclaimed interest.
(c)  The disclaimer or the written waiver of the right to disclaim is binding
upon the disclaimant or person waiving and all persons claiming through or
under either of them.
(5)  The right to disclaim property or an interest therein is barred by:
(a)  an assignment, conveyance, encumbrance, pledge, or transfer of the
property or interest, or a contract therefor;
(b)  a written waiver of the right to disclaim;
(c)  an acceptance of the property or interest or a benefit under it; or
(d)  a sale of the property or interest under judicial sale made before the
disclaimer is made.
(6)  This section does not abridge the right of a person to waive, release,
disclaim, or renounce property or an interest therein under any other statute.
(7)  An interest in property that exists on July 1, 1998, as to which, if a
present interest, the time for filing a disclaimer under this section has not
expired or, if a future interest, the interest has not become indefeasibly
vested or the taker finally ascertained, may be disclaimed within nine months
after July 1, 1998.
